Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,149
State-certified seeds; plant parts; approval of standards; certification, defined.

Every person, firm, association, or corporation who or which issues, uses, or circulates any certificate, advertisement, tag, seal, poster, letterhead, marking, circular, or written or printed representation or description of or pertaining to seeds or plant parts intended for propagation or sale or sold or offered for sale in which the words Nebraska State Certified, State Certified, Nebraska Certified, or similar words or phrases are used or employed or in which are used or employed, signs, symbols, maps, diagrams, pictures, words, or phrases expressly or impliedly stating or representing that such seeds or plant parts comply with or conform to the standards or requirements recommended or approved by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or by any department, office, agency, or institution of the State of Nebraska shall be subject to the provisions of sections 81-2,149 to 81-2,154. Every issuance, use, or circulation of any certificate or any other instrument as described in this section shall be deemed to be certification as that term is employed in such sections.

Laws 1931, c. 151, § 1, p. 409;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1816;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,149;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 53.